Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 1
Definitions

§ 15-4-101. Definitions.

In this chapter (a) “local administration” means administration by a personal representative appointed in this state pursuant to appointment proceedings described in chapter 3[, title 15, Idaho Code].

(b) “Local personal representative” includes any personal representative appointed in this state pursuant to appointment proceedings described in chapter 3[, title 15, Idaho Code,] and excludes foreign personal representatives who acquire the power of a local personal representative pursuant to section 15-4-205[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

(c) “Resident creditor” means a person domiciled in, or doing business in this state, who is, or could be, a claimant against an estate of a nonresident decedent.